tr: Lastik konumu: Ön; Ön/Arka (evrensel); Arka; Diğer
zh-TW: 輪胎位置: 前輪; 前輪/後輪 (通用); 後輪; 其他
el: Θέση ελαστικού: Εμπρός; Εμπρός/Πίσω (γενικής χρήσης); Πίσω; Άλλο
cs: Poloha pneumatiky: Přední; Přední/zadní (univerzální); Zadní; Jiné
es: Posición del neumático: Delantero; Delantero/trasero (universal); Trasero; Otro
zh-CN: 轮胎位置: 前轮; 前轮/后轮通用; 后轮; 其他
pl: Pozycja opony: Przód; Przód/tył (uniwersalna); Tył; Inna
ro-RO: Poziția anvelopei: Față; Față/spate (universal); Spate; Altele
pt-BR: Pneu posição: Dianteiro; Dianteiro/traseiro (universal); Traseiro; Outros
de: Reifenposition: Vorne; Vorne/Hinten (universell); Hinten; Sonstige
pt-PT: Posição dos pneus: Dianteiro; Dianteiro/traseiro (universal); Traseiro; Outro
sk-SK: Poloha pneumatiky: Predná; Predná/zadná (univerzálna); Zadná; Iné
sv: Däckposition: Fram; Fram/bak (universell); Bak; Övrigt
da: Dækposition: Foran; Foran/bagpå (universel); Bagpå; Andet
en: Tire position: Front; Front/Rear (universal); Rear; Other
fr: Position du pneu: Avant; Avant/arrière (universel); Arrière; Autre
th: ตำแหน่งยาง: ล้อหน้า; หน้า/หลัง (ใช้ได้ทั่วไป); หลัง; อื่นๆ
nl: Bandpositie: Voor; Voor/achter (universeel); Achter; Overige
bg-BG: Позиция на гумата: Предна; Предна/задна (универсална); Задна; Друго
fi: Renkaan sijainti: Etu; Etu/taka (yleismalli); Taka; Muu
ko: 타이어 위치: 앞; 앞/뒤(공용); 뒤; 기타
hu: Gumiabroncs pozíciója: Első; Első/hátsó (univerzális); Hátsó; Egyéb
lt-LT: Padangos pozicija: Priekinė; Priekinė / galinė (universali); Galinė; Kita
hr-HR: Položaj gume: Prednja; Prednja/stražnja (univerzalna); Stražnja; Ostalo
ja: タイヤ位置: フロント; フロント/リア (ユニバーサル); リア; その他
ru: Положение шины: Передняя; Передняя/задняя (универсальная); Задняя; Другое
it: Posizione dello pneumatico: Anteriore; Anteriore/posteriore (universale); Posteriore; Altro
vi: Vị trí lốp xe: Trước; Trước/Sau (đa năng); Sau; Khác
sl-SI: Položaj pnevmatike: Spredaj; Spredaj/zadaj (univerzalno); Zadaj; Drugo
nb: Dekkposisjon: Foran; Foran/bak (universell); Bak; Annet